Hawaii statutes.
[§431:31-105] Sanctions for violations.
The vendor or its employee or authorized representative shall be subject to
sanctions pursuant to this chapter for the violation of any provision of this
chapter. [L 2012, c 321, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next